California statutes. Water Code
(b) An invitation for sealed proposals for the sale to the district of any of its outstanding refunding bonds for the payment of which the sinking fund was created.

(c) The time and place when the proposals will be opened.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25064.

All proposals received in response to the notice shall be opened by the board in open meeting at the time specified in the notice or at a time to which the meeting is adjourned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25065.

Any or all of the proposals may, in the discretion of the board, be rejected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25066.

If no bids are received or if the bids received and accepted are not sufficient to exhaust the money on hand and available for the purpose, the district through its board may purchase at private sale with any available money in the sinking fund any bonds for the payment of which the sinking fund was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25067.

No proposal to sell bonds to the district pursuant to this article at a price in excess of their par value shall be accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25068.

All bonds purchased from sinking fund money shall be forthwith canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Authorized Refunding Modification [25091. - 25092.]

25091.

The board shall call an election for the purpose of authorizing the modification of a refunding plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

25092.

Notice of the election shall be given and it shall be held and its result determined and declared substantially in the same manner as a bond election, except that a majority vote only is required for the approval of the modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Unauthorized Refunding Modification [25110. - 25119.]

25110.

The provisions of this article are applicable only to refunding plans which both:

(a) Were adopted prior to January 31, 1939.

(b) Then contained no provisions for modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25111.

The terms of any refunding plan and of the refunding bonds outstanding thereunder may be modified from time to time if the modification is approved in the manner provided in this article by all of the following:

(a) The district. 

(b) The holders of all of the outstanding refunding bonds affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

25112.

The approval of the modification by the district shall be given by a resolution of its board and by its voters at an election called by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25113.

Notice of the election shall be given and it shall be held in substantially the same manner as a bond election, except that a majority vote only is required for approval of the modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25115.

The approval of the holders of outstanding refunding bonds affected by the modification shall be evidenced by either of the following:

(a) The written consent of all of the owners and holders of the bonds.

(b) An order under federal bankruptcy law that is binding upon the holders and owners of all of the outstanding refunding bonds affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 94, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25116.

If the modification is approved in the manner provided in this article, the district need not issue new refunding bonds and coupons in exchange for outstanding bonds and coupons the terms of which have been modified, but in lieu thereof the district may provide for the indorsement on the outstanding refunding bonds and coupons affected of the terms of the modification or a reference to its terms if contained in an instrument of modification or modified refunding plan, all as provided in the modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25117.

If the modification or modified refunding plan provides for the extension of the time of maturity of all or any of the refunding bonds, the district in lieu of issuing new refunding bonds may indorse upon the face of the refunding bonds extended the new date of their maturity and attach to them new interest coupons to evidence interest payments to become due to the extended date of maturity of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25118.

All refunding bonds the terms of which have been modified shall continue to be binding outstanding bonds of the district and negotiable instruments irrespective of any indorsement of the terms of the modification or of the extension of the time of payment and shall be payable in accordance with their terms and the provisions of the modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25119.

Any modification of any refunding plan adopted pursuant to the provisions of this article may provide for its subsequent modification with the consent of the holders of any specified percentage of the refunding bonds affected by the modification in the manner provided in it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Bond Provisions [25200. - 25354.]



  ARTICLE 1. Bond Terms [25200. - 25219.]

25200.

As used in this chapter “bonds” includes both construction and refunding bonds except as otherwise expressly provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25201.

Subject to the provisions of this article the board shall prescribe the form of the bonds issued by the district and of the attached interest coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25202.

An issue of bonds means all of the bonds issued in accordance with a single proposal approved at an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25203.

Each issue of bonds shall be numbered consecutively as authorized, and the bonds of each issue shall be numbered consecutively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25204.

The board shall fix the date of each issue of bonds and may divide any issue into two or more divisions and fix different dates for the bonds of each respective division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25205.

The date of any bond shall be subsequent to the date of the election at which its issuance was authorized and prior to that of its delivery to a purchaser from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25206.

The date of issue of any bond shall be deemed to be the date of the bond appearing on its face.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25207.

The board shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

25208.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed 8 percent per year to be fixed by the board, except that, if, before the issuance of the bonds, the board determines, to the best of its knowledge and belief, that the interest on the bonds will be subject to federal income taxation under then existing law, the bonds may bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 10 percent per year to be fixed by the board.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1984.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 62, Sec. 3.   Effective June 14, 1981.   Section operative January 1, 1984, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25208.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 25208 of the Water Code and any other provisions of law, the Board of Directors of the Solano Irrigation District may determine and provide, in any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds pursuant to this division, for the bonds to bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 18 percent a year if, before the issuance of the bonds, the board determines, to the best of its knowledge and belief, that the interest on the bonds will be subject to federal income taxation under then existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   Effective July 19, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

25209.

The interest shall be payable on the first day of January and the first day of July of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25209.1.

In the case of any district described in Section 20560.2, notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the interest on any bonds of the district payable solely from revenue issued for purposes of financing works of the district for the generation, transmission, distribution, or sale of electric power shall be payable at least semiannually on the dates designated by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

25210.

The board shall designate the places at which the bonds and the interest thereon shall be payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25211.

The bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25212.

Each bond shall be made payable at a given time for its full face value and not for a percentage thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25213.

The principal on bonds shall be payable on the first day of January or the first day of July of the years designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25213.1.

In the case of any district described in Section 20560.2, notwithstanding any other provision of this division, each principal payment, other than payments of principal upon optional redemption, on any bonds of the district payable solely from revenue issued for purposes of financing works of the district for the generation, transmission, distribution, or sale of electric power shall be payable on one of the dates designated by the board pursuant to Section 25209.1 for payment of interest on the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

25214.

In no case shall the maturity of any bond be more than 50 years from its date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25215.

When bonds are made callable, a statement to that effect shall be set forth on the face of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25216.

Each bond shall be signed by the president and secretary then in office at any time between the date of the bond and its delivery to a purchaser from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25217.

The seal of the district shall be impressed on each bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25218.

The interest coupons shall be signed by the secretary then in office at any time between the date of the bond and its delivery to a purchaser from the district. The signature of the secretary may be made by facsimile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25219.

Unless otherwise provided in the proceedings for the issuance of the bonds, they and the interest on them shall be paid from money derived from an annual assessment upon land or charges which in the discretion of the board are fixed and collected in lieu thereof and all land shall be and remain liable to be assessed for these payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Payment Solely from Revenue [25240. - 25245.]

25240.

As used in this article and Article 3 of this chapter “revenue” means all or any part of any source or sources of payment excluding assessments but including the proceeds of any existing or proposed contract or contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25242.

If any or all of the principal of any bonds is made payable only from revenue, the board shall cause a brief statement of the limitations upon the payment of principal or portion thereof to be set forth in the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25243.

If the limitations affect the payment of the interest of the bonds or any part thereof, a brief statement of the limitations shall be set forth in the interest coupons representing the interest and also in the bonds to which the interest coupons are appurtenant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25244.

If the limitations affect the payment of only a portion of the interest which will accrue on any bonds, the board may provide either that:

(a) The entire installment of interest payable on any interest payment date shall be represented by a single coupon which shall contain a brief statement as to the portion of interest subject to the limitations.

(b) The portion of interest not subject to the limitations and the portion of interest subject to the limitations shall be represented by separate interest coupons, the coupons representing the portion of the interest as to which limitations exist containing a brief statement of the limitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25245.

If any board provides that the principal, interest, or both of any bonds or any portion of the principal, interest, or both shall be payable solely from designated revenue, neither the district nor any officer thereof shall be held for payment otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 58.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Allocation of Revenue to Bond Payment [25260. - 25264.]

25260.

Any designated revenue may by resolution of the board be allocated to the payment of the whole or any portion of the principal or interest or both of any bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25261.

The allocation may be for either or both:

(a) Payment of the whole or any part of the principal or interest or both of any bonds payable solely from revenue.

(b) As additional security for the payment of the whole or any part of the principal or interest or both of any bonds payable from assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25262.

Until the payment or retirement of the bonds for the benefit of which an allocation was made, the revenue allocated shall be applied solely to the payment of the obligation specified in the allocating resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25263.

An allocation may be made for the exclusive benefit of any one or more issues or portions of issues of bonds of a district designated in the allocating resolutions or in the discretion of its board for the benefit of any bonds of the district at any time issued or outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25264.

Any allocation shall be irrevocable until all of the bonds for which the allocation was made and their appurtenant coupons have been paid or retired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Allocation of Revenue to Reserve Fund [25280. - 25280.]

25280.

Any sources of revenue of any district may, by order of its board, be irrevocably allocated to a reserve fund established to pay the interest or principal of any bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 59.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Callable Bonds [25300. - 25304.]

25300.

A district may, by resolution of its board adopted at or prior to the time of issuing any bonds then proposed to be issued, provide for the call and redemption prior to their fixed maturity of any of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

25301.

Callable bonds may be redeemed in addition to other methods permitted in the following manner:

(a) In numerical order or by lot as prescribed in the resolution.

(b) On any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity.

(c) At not exceeding their par value and accrued interest or on the terms provided in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.

Notice designating the bonds called for redemption shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25303.

The first publication of the redemption notice shall be not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days prior to the date fixed for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25304.

If on the date fixed for redemption the district has provided funds available for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds called, interest on them ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Bond Issuance [25325. - 25336.]

25325.

A district may sell any bonds from time to time in such quantities as may be necessary and most advantageous to raise money for the purposes for which they were authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25326.

Before any sale the board shall by resolution entered on its minutes set forth all of the following:

(a) Its intention to sell a specified amount of the bonds.

(b) The day, hour, and place of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25327.

The board shall give notice of the sale by publication for at least three weeks in some newspaper published in the office county and in any other newspaper at its discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25328.

The notice shall state that sealed proposals will be received by the board at the district office for the purchase of bonds until the day and hour specified in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25329.

At the time specified the board shall open the proposals and award the purchase of the bonds or any portion of them to the highest responsible bidder or bidders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25330.

No proposal shall be accepted which is not accompanied by a certified check for a reasonable percentage of the amount of the bid as determined by the board, but in no event less than two per cent, to apply on the purchase price of the bonds. The amount of the check shall be forfeited if after the acceptance of his proposal the bidder refuses to complete his purchase on the terms stated in his proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25330.1.

In the case of any district described in Section 20560.2 with respect to construction bonds issued for purposes of financing the works described in that section, notwithstanding Section 25327, the board shall give notice of sale of any bonds payable solely from revenue which are to be sold at public sale by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county not less than five days prior to the date of sale in the manner as the board may prescribe. Notwithstanding Section 25328, the notice shall state that sealed bids for the purchase of the bonds will be received at the place specified for that receipt, which need not be at the district office, until the day and hour specified by the board.

Notwithstanding Section 25329, at the time specified, the bids for the bonds shall be opened by the board or, if so determined by the board, shall be opened by an authorized member or officer of the board and referred to the board.

Notwithstanding Section 25330, a bid for the bonds need not be accompanied by a certified check for at least 2 percent of the amount of the bid if so determined by the board of the district, but no bid shall be accepted which is not accompanied by a certified or cashier’s check for at least 1 percent of the amount of the bid as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

25331.

The board may reject any or all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25332.

In case no award is made, the board thereafter may either readvertise the bonds or any part of them for sale or sell them at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25333.5.

In the case of any district described in Section 20560.2 with respect to construction bonds issued for purposes of financing the works described in that section or bonds issued to refund those bonds, notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the board may determine by resolution entered upon the minutes that a negotiated sale of any bonds of the district payable solely from revenue will be in the best interest of the district, in which case the bonds may be sold at a negotiated sale on terms as may be approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

25334.

A district may exchange its construction bonds for any property or interest in property which the district might acquire with the proceeds of the bonds, if sold, or for the capital stock of any corporation owning the property, upon terms the board deems best.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25335.

Any refunding bonds may be either:

(a) Sold from time to time in the same manner as other bonds of the district. 

(b) Exchanged for other bonds or warrants of the district upon terms approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 684.)
-------------------------------------------

25336.

Any outstanding bonds refunded or exchanged shall be immediately canceled by the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Bond Cancellation [25350. - 25354.]

25350.

Whenever the whole or any portion of any issue of bonds of any district remains unissued for more than one year after the date of the election at which the bonds were authorized, the board, by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the board, may cancel all or any of those bonds and all coupons appurtenant to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25351.

Whenever a resolution to cancel bonds is offered, its consideration shall be postponed to a date fixed by the board which is subsequent to final publication of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25352.

The resolution together with a notice stating the time fixed by the board for the consideration of the resolution shall be published once a week for at least two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943.   Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25353.

After the adoption of a resolution to cancel bonds no other bonds shall be issued in pursuance of the proceedings taken in relation to the issuance of the bonds so canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25354.

Any bonds and coupons so canceled shall be destroyed under the direction of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Issuance of Bonds Pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 [25400. - 25402.]

25400.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, revenue bonds, including refunding revenue bonds, may be issued by an irrigation district under and pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.

This chapter provides an alternative authority and procedure for the subject to which it relates but does not affect any other law relating to the same or a similar subject. When proceeding under this chapter, its provisions only need be followed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2089.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “enterprise,” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), shall be limited to and shall include only those works or property authorized to be acquired, constructed, improved, or financed by an irrigation district pursuant to this division, but shall not include any of the following:

(a) Works or property for the distribution of electric energy for lighting, heating, and power for public or private uses.

(b) Works or property already employed in the generation, production, transmission, distribution, sale, or lease of power for public utility purposes, except where the acquisition of those works or property is by mutual agreement between the district and the owner of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. ASSESSMENTS [25500. - 26677.]



  CHAPTER 1. Assessment [25500. - 25559.]



  ARTICLE 1. Assessment Book [25500. - 25509.]

25500.

As used in this part “land” includes city and town lots and excepts improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25501.

As used in this part “improvements” includes trees, vines, alfalfa, all growing crops, and all buildings and structures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25502.

Annually, between March 1st and June 1st the assessor shall assess all land in his district to the persons owning, claiming, possessing, or controlling it, except that if all funds required to be raised are raised other than by assessment, no assessment need be levied and no assessment roll need be prepared or equalized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 818.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.

All of the land shall be assessed in accordance with Section 401 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as of 12:01 a.m. on the first day of March of that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 818.)
-------------------------------------------

25504.

The assessor shall prepare an assessment book with appropriate headings, in which shall be listed all of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25505.

The book shall contain:

(a) The name of the assessee if known to the assessor, and if the name is not known to the assessor, “unknown owners.”

(b) A description of the land sufficient to identify it.

(c) An estimate of the number of acres except in the case of city or town lots.

(d) The cash value of the land.

(e) A separate designation and description of
 any land subject to a different rate of assessment from other land.

(f) A column for showing the changed valuations after equalization.

(g) Any other things required by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25506.

Columns with the headings “Lot” and “Block” or either of them may be provided in the assessment book for the designation of lots and blocks or either of them in any city, town, or recorded subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25507.

Land as to which a partial redemption has been effected shall thereafter be separately described on the assessment book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25508.

On or before the first Monday in August in each year the assessor shall complete his assessment book and deliver it to the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25509.

Where the assessor possesses a complete, accurate map of any land or where such a complete, accurate map of any land prepared for county purposes pursuant to Section 325 or 327 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is possessed by the assessor, he may number or letter the parcels or adopt the parcel numbers or letters used by the county assessor, and may renumber or reletter the parcels or prepare new map pages for any portion of such map to show combinations or divisions of parcels. Upon the board approving such maps and the manner of numbering and lettering the parcels, the parcel numbers and letters may be used in lieu of other description of the land involved in the
 assessment book, equalization of the assessments, assessment bills, if any, receipts for payment of assessments, published lists of delinquencies, certificates of sale, and in all other assessment proceedings and documents; except that land shall not be described in collector’s deeds or other deeds by reference to any such map unless such map has been filed for record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which such land is located.

Any such map used for assessment purposes, or a copy thereof, shall at all times be publicly displayed in the office of the assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Land Escaping Assessment [25525. - 25528.]

25525.

Any land which should have been assessed escaping the payment of any assessment for any reason shall in addition to its current assessment be entered in the assessment book by the assessor at the valuation which he deems proper for the year of the escaped assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25526.

The additional assessments on land escaping the payment of an assessment shall be equalized as provided in this part for current assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25527.

At the time of levying the current assessment the district by its board shall levy on land escaping the payment of an assessment an additional assessment at the rate fixed in the year of the escaped assessment. If no rate was legally fixed in that year, the district shall levy an assessment on the land at the rate which should have been computed in that year to raise the amount of money then required by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25528.

The additional assessments shall be payable at the same times as the current assessment, and if not paid, shall be subject to like penalties and proceedings to enforce collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Equalization [25550. - 25559.]

25550.

Upon receiving the assessment book from the assessor the secretary shall immediately give notice of its receipt and of the time, fixed by the board, when the board acting as a board of equalization will meet to equalize assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25551.

The notice shall be given by publication at least twice in a newspaper published in each affected county and if the office county is not an affected county, also in a newspaper published in the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25552.

The notice shall be first published at least 20 days and not more than 30 days before the time fixed for the first meeting of the board as a board of equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25553.

Failure to publish the equalization notice in any county other than the office county shall not affect the validity of any assessment on land in a county in which notice was published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25554.

Until the equalization is finished, the assessment book shall remain in the district office in the possession of the secretary for the inspection of all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25555.

On the day specified in the notice of equalization, the board shall meet as a board of equalization to hear and determine objections to the valuation, acreage, or any matter pertaining to the assessment coming before it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25556.

The board acting as a board of equalization shall continue in session from time to time as long as may be necessary but not to exceed 10 days exclusive of Sundays.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25557.

The board acting as a board of equalization shall order any changes in the assessment that it deems just.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25558.

The secretary shall be present during the equalization proceedings and shall make all changes ordered in the assessment book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25559.

Within 10 days after the close of the equalization session the secretary shall add the total values and determine the gross assessed valuation of the lands after final equalization by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Levy [25650. - 25725.]



  ARTICLE 1. Amount of Assessments Generally [25650. - 25656.]

25650.

Each district by its board each year within 15 days after the close of its session as a board of equalization shall levy an annual assessment upon the land within the district in an amount sufficient to raise all of the following:

(a) Interest due or that will become due on all outstanding bonds of the district and interest which the board believes will become due on district bonds authorized but not sold, all respectively before the close of the next ensuing calendar year.

(b) Principal of all bonds of the district that have matured or that will
 mature before the close of the next ensuing calendar year.

To the extent that provision is otherwise made as permitted by law for the payment of bond principal and interest, levies for principal and interest pursuant to this section need not be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25651.

(a) If a refunding bond plan or modification of it provides for the raising of a fixed amount each year to be applied to the payment of interest on or redemption of refunding bonds in the manner provided in the refunding plan or modification of it, the annual assessment shall include a levy in the amount required to be raised by assessment in that year pursuant to the plan or modification of it.

(b) If the proceedings in connection with the issuance of refunding bonds or modification of them provides for the raising of an amount to be paid annually into a sinking fund to pay the principal
 or interest of the refunding bonds, the annual assessment shall include a levy in an amount sufficient to provide the sinking fund payments for the current year. The amount required to be raised for the sinking fund shall be reduced by the amount of surplus funds from other sources in the sinking fund in excess of the amount required to be therein at the time of levying the current annual assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25652.

The annual assessment shall also include a levy sufficient to pay all of the following:

(a) Sums due or that will become due from the district before the close of the next ensuing calendar year on account of rentals or charges for property acquired by the district under lease or contract.

(b) Sums due or that will become due from the district before the close of the next ensuing calendar year on account of contracts for power or fuel for the pumping of water for irrigation within the district, the payment of the cost of which power or fuel has
 not been provided for in any other manner.

(c) All outstanding warrants of the district due or to become due before the close of the next ensuing calendar year.

(d) All obligations of the district which have been reduced to judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25653.

The annual assessment may include a levy sufficient to raise any or all of the following:

(a) The amount that the board determines is necessary for a depreciation fund for the replacement or reconstruction of any specific units of its works.

(b) The amount that the board determines is necessary, not to exceed 4 percent of the aggregate value of the land according to the latest equalized assessment, and not otherwise provided for, to pay for the maintenance and operation of the district for the ensuing calendar year.

(c) The amount that the board determines is needed to be raised by assessment for any other district purposes not exceeding 4 percent of the aggregate value of the land according to the latest equalized assessment.

(d) An amount not exceeding 1 percent of the total assessed value of the land that the board deems proper to pay into the bond fund to be used for the purchase of bonds of the district not yet due or for payment into a fund to pay such bonds as they become due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1507.)
-------------------------------------------

25654.

The annual assessment may include a levy on land included by inclusion proceedings subsequent to formation of the district sufficient to pay the obligations as they accrue assumed by the included land in the proceedings including it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25655.
